ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/nn_NO/hyph_nn_NO.dic
yreis2
y1ru
y1rå
y1om
y1op
yn1av
y1na
y2nag
y1no
ynd3rin2g.
yn1do
yn1skj
yns2k
yn1s1j
yn1sl
yns1v
y3net
y1ne
yn1t1h
y1dr
yd1ri
yd1o
yd1s
y1i
y1ka
y1ko
y1ki
yk1ki
y1kj
yke1i
y1ke
y1klo
yk1li
yk1lu2b
y1klu
y2klus
yk2tel
yk1te
y1sar
y1san
ys1as
y1so
ys1n
ys1ins
y1si
ys1kar
ys1kat
ys2so
ys3se
ys1s2t
y1s1l
ys1tan
ys3tal2l.
ys1tra
ys1tre
ys1ti
y3s2te1re
ys1te
y1s2tei
y1su
ys1v
ys1å
ye2a
y1er
y1en
y1e1b
y1ek
y1es
yes2ter
yes1te
y1el
y1em
y1et
y1la
y1lo
y1li
ylkes1
yl1k
yl1ke
ylke2m
y1le
y1læ1
y1lys
ym1j
y1mu1
y1ta
y1to
yt2na
yt1n
y1ti
yt1v
y2h1r
y1h
y1pa
y1pr
ypres3ten
ypres2t
ypres1te
y1po
y1pi
y2p1s
y1pe
y1v
y1f
y1f1l
yg1s
yg1la
y1g1u
y1å
2g.
1ga
3g2a.
2g1ar1ta
gang2
ga3lo
ga1to
3ga2v.
ga2ve1a
ga1ve
1gr
3gr2a.
gra2m1
gro1ve
3gref
1g2o.
go1ri1
1gon
1god
go1i
go1s
1go1e
1gol
1got
g1op
1gog
go2ge
2gogef
g2n1ak
g1na
g1nor
gn1s
gne3d
g1ne
g1nu
g1ny
2gd
g1dr
g1do
g1dom2s2
gd1øy
1gi
gi1ro
g1ind
gis1t
gi1e2
g1k
gs1ar
gsan1
gs1ans
gs1ad
gs1ak
gs1al
gs1at
gs1av
gs1o
g2s1in
g1si
gs1il
gs1kam
g1ski
gs1kj
g1s2ke
gs1s
g2s1er
g1se
g2sen
gs1end
gs1e2ks
g2s1em
g2s1ev
gs1l
g1s2lek
gs1m
gs1mo1
g1stra
g1stof
gst1in
gs2te
g1st2e.
g1stel
gs3tem
g1s3tet
gs1tur
g1stø
g1sun
gs1p
gspar1ti3
g1s2pi
gs1v
gs1ø
g2s1y
g1s1gå
gs1g
gs1år
1gj
4gjerings
gje1ri
4gje4rin4g3e
1ge
ge1ru
ge1no
gen3sv
3ge1ne
ge1d
geir1
ge1in
geist1
ge1k2
ge1sk
ge1sta
ge2spi
ge1sp
ge2l1ak
ge1la
gel1ø
gems2
ge1p
ge1v
gefor2
ge1fo
2ge1ga
1gl2a.
2g1land.
1glad
1glas
g1lag
1glo
g1lin
1glik
g1liv
g1lig
g2l1s
g1l2j
3glear1ta
gle1a
3gleres
gle1re
g1lei
glesan2
gle1sa
1glel
3glevorn
gle1vo
1glef
g1ly
2g1m
2gt
g1ta
g1tr
g1ti
gtek1
g1te
g1ty
1gu
gu1re
gun3sti
guns2t
guds3
gu1le
gu1ta
gu1v
g1p
g1v
1gør
gæ1re
g1f
gfor4
g1ye
2gg
gg1or
gg1sk
gg1st
1gå
å1a
å2r1av
år1on
årba2
år1b
2å3r4in1ga
år4ig
års3k
å2rs
2år1sj
år1sl
år2s2t
å1r2e.
å1o
ån1o
åne3d
å1ne
åbå1
å1b
åd3rin2g.
åd1s1n
å1i
å1ka
å1kra
åk1rå
å1kj
åk1ly
åk1v
å1s2k
ås3k2a.
å2s3k2e.
ås1ke
å2s3ken
ås3ky
åss1
åse1i
å1se
ås1p
å1sø
å1j
å1e
å1la
å1lo
å1li
å2l2s
ål3s1b
å1le
åle1s
ål1u
ål1ø
å1ly
å1ti
åt1sk
åts1l
ått1o
åt1v
å1pa
å2ps1
å1pe
åpe2k
åpe2l
å1pl
å1v
å1ø
å1f
åg1l
åg1ø
é1a
é1r
é1d
édes2s1
é1de
xan1
1xi
x1e
x1u
ca1ro
ca1g
1cr
cru2
co1r
con1
co1u
co1v
co1g
1ci
cis1
c1ka
c2k1s
c2h
1cu
cu3b
cæ1
1wa
1we2
w1z
1q
qu1
qui1
1za
zas1
1zi
zia2
zis1
z1k
z1s
1ze
ze2a
z1m
1zy
ü1r
ê1re
